Maryland, session 2025, SB0235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
SUBTITLE 14. PROJECT RESTORE PROGRAM.
6–1401.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0235*

SENATE BILL 235
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PLACE–BASED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATION” MEANS A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT ENGAGES IN:
(1) WORK THAT IMPROVES A SPECIFIC NEIGHBORHOOD OR BUSINESS
DISTRICT IN THE STATE;
(2) WORK THAT CONTRIBUTES TO THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OR
HISTORIC PRESERVATION OF A LOCAL BUSINESS DISTRICT WITHIN THE
ORGANIZATION’S JURISDICTION; AND
(3) PROGRAMS AND ACTIVITIES THAT SUPPORT SMALL BUSINESSES
WITHIN THE ORGANIZATION’S JURISDICTION.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PROJECT RESTORE PROGRAM.
(D) “QUALIFIED APPLICANT” MEANS:
(1) A PLACE–BASED COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATION; OR
(2) A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(E) “QUALIFIED ENTITY” MEANS A BUSINESS OR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION THAT:
(1) IS LOCATED IN A SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY; AND
(2) PLANS TO IMPROVE A VACANT PROPERTY AND BE OPEN AND
OPERATIONAL IN THE PROPERTY WITHIN THE TERM OF A SUBGRANT AWARDED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “SUBJECT PROPERTY” MEANS ALL OF, OR A PORTION OF, A PROPERTY
THAT:
(1) IS A VACANT PROPERTY AT THE TIME THAT A QUALIFIED
APPLICANT APPLIES FOR PROGRAM FUNDS; AND
(2) WILL BE IMPROVED AND OPEN AND OPERATIONAL BY A
QUALIFIED ENTITY WITH THE TERM OF A SUBGRANT AWARDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 235 3
(G) “SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY” MEANS AN AREA DESIGNATED AS A
SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY UNDER § 6–205 OF THIS TITLE.
(H) “VACANT PROPERTY” MEANS ALL OF, OR A PORTION OF, A PROPERTY
THAT IS UNOCCUPIED BY A TENANT WITH A LEASE.
6–1402.
(A) THERE IS A PROJECT RESTORE PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST QUALIFIED BUSINESSES
AND ORGANIZATIONS WHOSE MISSION AND WORK CONTRIBUTE TO THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT OR HISTORIC PRESERVATION OF LOCAL BUSINESS DISTRICTS AND
WHOSE ACTIVITIES SUPPORT THE SMALL BUSINESSES WITHIN THE JURISDICTIONS
THEY SERVE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DISTRIBUTE PROGRAM FUNDS TO QUALIFIED
APPLICANTS THAT:
(1) SERVE WITHIN A SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY; AND
(2) APPLY FOR PROGRAM FUNDS.
(D) (1) EACH QUALIFIED APPLICANT THAT RECEIVES PROGRAM FUNDS
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL DISTRIBUTE SUBGRANTS TO
QUALIFIED ENTITIES.
(2) ELIGIBLE USES OF SUBGRANTS AWARDED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION INCLUDE:
(I) RENTAL PAYMENTS TOWARD THE LEASE OF A SUBJECT
PROPERTY;
(II) THE RENOVATION OR IMPROVEMENT OF THE INTERIOR AND
EXTERIOR OF A SUBJECT PROPERTY;
(III) THE PURCHASE OF FURNITURE, FIXTURES, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR A SUBJECT PROPERTY; AND
(IV) THE PURCHASE OF A SUBJECT PROPERTY BY A QUALIFIED
ENTITY.

SENATE BILL 235
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE A QUALIFIED APPLICANT TO
USE UP TO 15% OF THE PROGRAM FUNDS AWARDED TO THE QUALIFIED APPLICANT
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION FOR SALARIES AND OTHER OPERATING
COSTS.
6–1403.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.